District of Columbia statutes.
22-4110

Repealed

Notification of changes of address.

Repealed.

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 11, 44 DCR 1232
July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 19, 47 DCR 797
1981 Ed., § 24-1110.
Temporary amendment of section: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-28 amended this section to read as follows:
“(a) A registrant shall immediately report a change of address to the police district having jurisdiction where the registrant has been residing.
“(b) A person who meets the registration requirements of this act and who moves into the District of Columbia from another jurisdiction shall register with the Department within 10 days of establishing a residence in the District of Columbia, or of re-establishing a residence in the District of Columbia if the person is a former District of Columbia resident.
“(c) If the registrant relocates to another state, the Department shall notify the law enforcement agency with which the registrant must register in the new state.
“(d) The Department shall ensure that the registry is updated promptly, and shall purge outdated addressees and shall include new addresses for all registrants.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-28 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-287 amended this section to read as follows:
“(a) A registrant shall immediately report a change of address to the police district having jurisdiction where the registrant has been residing.
“(b) A person who meets the registration requirements of this act and who moves into the District of Columbia from another jurisdiction shall register with the Department within 10 days of establishing a residence in the District of Columbia, or of re-establishing a residence in the District of Columbia if the person is a former District of Columbia resident.
“(c) If the registrant relocates to another state, the Department shall notify the law enforcement agency with which the registrant must register in the new state.
“(d) The Department shall ensure that the registry is updated promptly, and shall purge outdated addresses and shall include new addresses for all registrants.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-287 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of § 24-1110 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-55, April 21, 1999, 46 DCR 4287).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of § 24-1110 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Third Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-101, July 9, 1999, 46 DCR 6015).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-133, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6771).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Legislative Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-176, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9244).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-229, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 487).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-308, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2714).